Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 5 State Lands Generally
22-5-406. Limited quitclaim of streambed of Mulberry River.

(a)

The State of Arkansas quitclaims, to the owners of adjacent lands, title to the streambed of the Mulberry River, excluding oil, gas, and other mineral rights underlying the stream, to the center of the stream. However, the state retains an easement to run with the land for free passage by the public over the land by canoe, boat, other watercraft, swimming, wading, or walking, and for fishing, recreation, travel, commerce, and other purposes.

(b)(1)

The State of Arkansas relinquishes and quitclaims to the owners of oil, gas, and other minerals underlying adjacent lands, and to their lessees, all right, title, and interest in and to the oil, gas, and other minerals underlying the bed of the Mulberry River.

(2)

No affirmative action shall be required by the mineral owner or lessee of the State of Arkansas to enable the mineral owner or lessee to retain ownership of or leasehold interest in the minerals under the bed of the Mulberry River.

(3)(A)

If the mineral owner or lessee desires record proof of his or her continued ownership of the oil, gas, and other minerals, he or she may file an application with the Commissioner of State Lands for a quitclaim deed covering the oil, gas, and other minerals under the bed of the river.

(B)

If the lands have been surveyed and platted, the mineral owner may furnish the Commissioner of State Lands a copy of the survey and plat.

(C)

If the survey and plat sufficiently identify the land, no further survey shall be required.

(4)(A)

In the alternative, the mineral owner may file with his or her application a deposit of the estimated cost of a survey, and the Commissioner of State Lands shall direct the county surveyor of the county in which the lands are located, or some other competent surveyor, to make an accurate survey of the lands and to plat them in reference to the survey of adjacent lands and file the survey and plat in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(B)

Upon the filing of the survey and plat, the Commissioner of State Lands shall pay for the cost of the survey out of the money deposited as provided in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.

(C)

If the deposit is insufficient for that purpose, the Commissioner of State Lands may require an additional deposit.

(D)

If any deposited funds remain after payment, they shall be refunded to the depositor.

(5)

After the survey and plat are filed, the applicant shall file affidavits of at least two (2) competent persons having full personal knowledge of the facts, establishing that the applicant is the present owner or lessee of the minerals in and under the streambed.

(6)

Upon receipt of the survey and affidavits, the Commissioner of State Lands may issue a quitclaim deed to the applicant upon the payment of a deed fee of one dollar ($1.00). The quitclaim deed establishes that the state makes no claim to the oil, gas, and other minerals under the bed of the stream.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 830, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 872, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1027 — 10-1029.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Subsection (b) of this section was formerly codified as §22-5-816.

22-5-407. Sixteenth section school lands.

(a)

Any person claiming to be the owner of land in this state known as sixteenth section school land, whose claim is based on a regular, unbroken chain of title for a period of not less than twelve (12) years, and to whose claim there has not been an adverse claimant for a period of not less than twelve (12) years, and the owner and those from whom he or she derived title have been in actual possession and have paid taxes thereon for a period of not less than twelve (12) years, and who is in actual possession at the time application is made to the state for a deed thereto, shall have all title, legal and equitable, that the State of Arkansas may have or appear to have in any such lands vested in the owner or parties and their grantees.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands, upon proper proof being made to him or her, is directed to execute a deed conveying to the parties all the right, title, and interest that the state may have in the lands.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 183, § 1, p. 472; 1911, No. 10, § 1; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9140, 9141; Acts 1921, No. 661, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 11768, 11769; Acts 1963, No. 525, § 1; 1971, No. 446, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-208.

Cross References.

As to sixteenth section school lands, see §6-13-108.

22-5-408. State Bank lands.

(a)

Where the claim of the State of Arkansas to any land conveyed to the Bank of the State of Arkansas under and by virtue of the Acts of the General Assembly of January 31, 1843, and February 3, 1843, providing for the liquidation of the assets of the bank, and the Acts of January 4, 1845, and January 10, 1845, authorizing the officers of the bank to compromise debts due the bank and to take property in payment of the debts, and the Act of December 23, 1846, vesting the title in the State of Arkansas to all property so conveyed to the bank, conflicts with the title of any person who, together with those under whom he or she claims and from whom he or she deraigns title either by deed, devise, or inheritance, has been in continuous possession and paying the taxes assessed against the land for more than forty (40) years prior to the passage of this section, the State of Arkansas relinquishes its title to the land in favor of the occupant and claimant thereof.

(b)

When the owner or occupant shall present to the Commissioner of State Lands satisfactory proof that he or she and those under whom he or she claims and from whom he or she deraigns title have been in continuous possession of the land for a period of forty (40) years or have continuously paid the taxes thereon for a period of forty (40) years under color of title, it is the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to execute to the owner, occupant, or claimant a quitclaim deed conveying to him or her all the title and interest of the State of Arkansas in the land, upon payment of a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Acts 1931, No. 245, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 8623, 8624; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-209, 10-210.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section,” Acts 1931, No. 245, was signed by the Governor and became effective on March 31, 1931.

22-5-409. Escheated corporation lands.

Where land has escheated to the state under the provisions of § 1 of Act of January 11, 1843, p. 56, the title of the state may be conveyed to the present owner by a quitclaim deed executed by the Commissioner of State Lands upon the filing with him or her of an application for the deed, accompanied by the affidavit of some credible, disinterested person showing that the applicant is the owner of the lands and that the taxes thereon have been paid for the past seven (7) years.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 47, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8749; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-211.

Publisher's Notes.

For prior laws validating sales of escheated corporation land, see Acts 1923, No. 564, and Acts 1927, No. 224.

22-5-410. Overdue tax lands and internal improvement lands.

(a)

Where the claim of the State of Arkansas to any land sold to the state under decree of the Pulaski County Chancery Court and under decree of the circuit and chancery courts of the various counties of the state, known as overdue tax decrees, and under decrees of the Pulaski County Chancery Court wherein various tracts of internal improvement lands were decreed to be sold and were sold back to the state, conflicts with the claim of any citizen or resident of the State of Arkansas who has been in possession of the land, or who, together with those under whom he or she claims and from whom he or she deraigns title by deed or inheritance, shall have paid the regular amount of county and state taxes assessed against the land, the taxes having been assessed against the land at the same rate as other lands to which the state has and had no claim were assessed, for twenty (20) years continuously prior to the passage of this section, the State of Arkansas relinquishes its title to the land in favor of the occupant and claimant thereof.

(b)

When the owner or occupant shall present to the Commissioner of State Lands satisfactory proof that he or she and those under whom he or she claims and from whom he or she deraigns title have been in continuous and undisturbed possession of the land for a period of twenty (20) years, or shall have continuously paid taxes thereon for a period of twenty (20) years under color of title, it is the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to execute to the owner, occupant, or claimant a deed quitclaiming all the title and interest of the state in the land on payment to the Commissioner of State Lands of a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Acts 1921, No. 671, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 1862, 1863, 8689, 8690; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-212, 10-213.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Amend. 80, adopted by voter referendum and effective July 1, 2001, abolished chancery courts and established circuit courts as the trial courts of original jurisdiction. The jurisdiction of the circuit courts now includes “all matters previously cognizable by Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts….”

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section,” Acts 1921, No. 671, declared an emergency and was signed by the Governor on March 29, 1921.

22-5-411. Filing of deeds to state property.

(a)

A copy of the deed or other primary evidence of title to realty belonging to the State of Arkansas shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands and shall be preserved by the Commissioner of State Lands as the other public records and files of his or her office.

(b)

The realty belonging to the State of Arkansas shall not, for the purposes of this section, include realty acquired by the State Highway Commission.

(c)

The officer charged with the administration of the affairs of each state office, department, agency, or institution having under its supervision and management realty owned by the State of Arkansas shall file with the Commissioner of State Lands a copy of the deed or other primary evidence of title to such property conveyed under fee simple title, and acquired by the state through gift or purchase or otherwise, within sixty (60) days after the acquisition and shall likewise notify the Commissioner of State Lands when any lands are disposed of.

(d)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall designate one (1) of his or her deputies to periodically call upon each state office, department, agency, and institution for the purpose of obtaining a copy of the deed or other primary evidence of title and for the purpose of determining whether the state office, department, agency, or institution has disposed of title to any state lands.

(e)

A statement by the administrative officer of any state office, department, agency, or institution to the effect that the office, department, agency, or institution does not supervise, control, or manage any realty owned by the state shall constitute sufficient compliance with this section.

(f)

In the event any office, department, agency, or institution does supervise, control, or manage realty belonging to the state for which no evidence of title can be found, the administrative officer in charge of the office, department, agency, or institution shall conduct an investigation to ascertain the facts pertaining to the acquisition of the realty by the state. A report of the investigation shall be made to the Commissioner of State Lands within sixty (60) days following the conclusion of the investigation.

(g)

In the event any state office, department, agency, or institution shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this section, the Commissioner of State Lands shall report such failure or refusal to comply to the Governor, who shall notify the administrative officer of any such office, department, agency, or institution to immediately report to him or her the reasons for his or her failure or refusal to comply.

(h)

Willful failure or refusal to comply with this section by any officer shall constitute nonfeasance in office.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 147, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-215 — 10-219.

Subchapter 5

— Acquisition of Forestland

Effective Dates.

Acts 1959, No. 174, § 4: Mar. 4, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that great inequities have arisen as a result of Acts 1947, No. 409, in that counties in which state forestry lands are located receive a substantial portion of the proceeds from the sale of state forestry land timber which is credited to the County General Fund, none of which may be used by the school districts therein; and that a portion of these funds are needed in order to maintain an adequate standard of education. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 101, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 28, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained that the State of Arkansas, acting through the State Forestry Commission, has entered into an Agreement with the Government of the United States whereby the State of Arkansas has received control of certain forest lands and is to receive title to same and in return has agreed to make certain payments to the Government of the United States from the proceeds of the land so purchased; and that said agreement requires the payment of interest on the purchase price; that the Government of the United States will cancel the sale if the interest is not paid; that such cancellation will be to the great harm and detriment to the State of Arkansas, it is hereby determined that it is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety that the provisions of this act be made effective at once. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and the provisions of this act shall be in effect immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-5-501. Authority to acquire.

(a)

The Arkansas Forestry Commission is authorized and empowered to acquire and hold in the name of the State of Arkansas title to lands which the commission determines, because of location, topographical, geological, and physical characteristics, are chiefly valuable for the production of forest crops, watershed protection, erosion and flood control, forestation, reforestation, and recreation.

(b)

Lands, when so acquired, shall be appropriately named, designated, administered, protected, and developed as state forests.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 1; 1963, No. 249, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-721.

Publisher's Notes.

As to purchase of Holland Bottom tract, see Acts 1985, No. 11.

22-5-502. Methods of acquisition.

(a)

Lands may be acquired by gift, devise, purchase, or exchange from any county, municipality, state or federal agency or department, person, firm, corporation, or association.

(b)

The Arkansas Forestry Commission shall not purchase or acquire any lands until the purchase price is available and the title and conveyance thereto, except as to tax titles, are examined and approved by the Attorney General as conveying good and merchantable title.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-722.

22-5-503. Exchange of lands.

The Arkansas Forestry Commission may exchange tracts of land acquired under the provisions of this subchapter for suitable land of equal value in furtherance of the administration and consolidation of these holdings and may sell and convey, upon terms requiring proper conservation practices, parts of tracts acquired under this subchapter suitable for cultivation.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-723.

22-5-504. Tax-forfeited lands — Distribution.

(a)

Any lands acquired by the Commissioner of State Lands in any county through tax sale, which are deemed by the Arkansas Forestry Commission to be suitable for forest purposes, may be conveyed to the state as forestlands by the proper officers of the county without reimbursement therefor.

(b)

Upon the acquisition of any lands in the furtherance of this subchapter, a survey of the tax returns to the county from each tract of land for the previous ten (10) consecutive years shall be made to determine the average annual tax income to the county and the political subdivisions therein from each tract involved. In making this study, taxes rendered upon improvement value shall not be included.

(c)(1)

The Arkansas Forestry Commission shall cause a record to be opened and kept showing, by counties, all lands in the State of Arkansas administered and managed by the commission as state forests and shall, annually on July 1, cause to be remitted to each county an amount equal to the average annual tax as determined in subsection (b) of this section. This amount is to be distributed as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

(2)

The income received by each county shall be distributed as follows:

(A)

Fifty percent (50%) to the county general fund; and

(B)

Fifty percent (50%) to the county school fund to be distributed by the county treasurer, within thirty (30) days from the date of receipt thereof, to the respective school districts of the county in the proportion that the area of state forestlands located in each school district bears to the total area of state forestlands within the county.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 4; 1959, No. 174, § 1; 1961, No. 412, § 1; 1981, No. 666, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-724.

22-5-505. Quieting title to acquired lands.

Upon the written request of the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Attorney General shall institute and prosecute to final decree all requisite suits to quiet the title of the state in and to lands acquired; and, in the prosecution of the suits, the state shall be exempted from the payment of costs.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-725.

22-5-506. Funding.

(a)

The purchase price of lands acquired shall be paid at the time of acquisition from the State Forestry Fund, and the acquisition shall not impose any liability upon the general credit or taxing power of the state.

(b)

All lands acquired under the provisions of this subchapter shall become the property of the state.

(c)

The Arkansas Forestry Commission is authorized, empowered, and directed to make requisite expenditures from the fund in executing the provisions of this subchapter and in protecting, developing, and administering the lands in the production, conservation, and marketing of forest products and in the forestation and reforestation of the lands.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-726, 9-727.

22-5-507. Cooperation with United States.

(a)

The Arkansas Forestry Commission is authorized and directed to fully cooperate with the departments, officers, and agencies of the federal government to meet the requirements of the rules, regulations, and acts of Congress relating to the objectives of this subchapter and to accept all funds and lands that may be available for the furthering of the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The commission is empowered to enter into such contracts and agreements with federal departments, officers, and agencies, not contrary to the laws of this state, as may be deemed necessary or convenient to the objectives of this subchapter.

(c)

The commission is further empowered to pay to the federal government the amount of money specified in the agreements and contracts, including any payments of interest required by the contracts or agreements.

(d)

All payments, whether for interest or otherwise, shall be made from the State Forestry Fund and shall not impose any liability upon the general credit or taxing power of the state.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 8; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 101, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-728.

22-5-508. Management of forests.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the State Forester, in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, the rules promulgated by the Arkansas Forestry Commission, and approved methods of forestry, to manage, control, protect, develop, utilize, and handle the lands in the state forests in such a manner as to best serve the greatest permanent advantage to the people of this state.

(b)

Where lands in the state forests are suited for demonstration and education purposes, the commission shall promulgate plans and procedures by which agricultural youth organizations may take an active part in assisting in carrying out the development, control, utilization, and experimentation provided for by this subchapter.

(c)

In the same manner as state school lands, forestlands may be leased by the commission for grazing, for the production of oil, gas, and other mineral or substances, and for other uses where the commission finds leasing and use will not militate against the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, §§ 9, 10; 1949, No. 337, § 1; 1963, No. 249, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-729, 9-730; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2366.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

22-5-509. Rules.

The Arkansas Forestry Commission is authorized and directed to approve, promulgate, and publish rules, and amendments or modifications thereof, reasonably required in directing and controlling the proper execution of the duties and attaining the objectives of this subchapter. These rules shall have the force and effect of law.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-732; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2367.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first and second sentences.

22-5-510. Records and reports.

The Arkansas Forestry Commission shall cause a record of all its proceedings relating to state forests, including the date of acquisition, description, source of title, purchase price, amounts expended in the development of each tract, and the forest to which allotted, to be kept in the office of the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 409, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-733; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 119.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “commission, and shall make a biannual written report thereof to the Governor”.

Subchapter 6

— Trespass

Effective Dates.

Acts 1919, No. 424, § 3: Mar. 27, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1931, No. 125, § 8: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 11, 1931. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby declared that it is urgent that the state should protect its land and timber against trespassers; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared and the immediate operation of this act being essential for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety of the state, this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

22-5-601. Investigators.

(a)

For the purpose of protecting the timber and lands of the state against trespass and to obtain reliable information upon which to predicate the proceedings provided for in this subchapter, the Attorney General shall have the authority to employ agents to make the necessary investigations and reports.

(b)

The agents shall report to the Attorney General all cases wherein they discover any trespassing on the lands of the state and shall also investigate reports made by others as to such trespass.

(c)

Different persons may, in the discretion of the Attorney General, be employed to make investigations, although not more than one (1) person shall be under employment at any given time.

(d)

An agent shall receive for his or her compensation an amount not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) per day while actually engaged in service pursuant to this section to the exclusion of all other business, may be reimbursed for necessary expenses while so engaged, and shall file with the Attorney General an itemized verified statement of his or her expenses.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 125, §§ 4, 5; Pope's Dig., §§ 8729, 8730; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-311, 10-312.

22-5-602. Suit to recover value of cut timber and to restrain trespass.

Whenever the Attorney General shall receive or obtain information that anyone is cutting timber upon state lands, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to institute suit to recover the value of the timber that has been cut and to restrain further trespass upon the land.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 125, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8726; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-306.

22-5-603. Suit for ejectment and recovery of rental value.

Whenever the Attorney General shall have information that anyone is in possession of land that has been forfeited to the state and the period of redemption has expired, he or she shall institute suit to eject the person from the land and to recover the rental value of the land during the time it was occupied after the period of redemption had expired.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 125, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8727; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-307.

22-5-604. Suit for cancellation of donation certificate.

(a)

Whenever the Attorney General shall receive information that any donee of state land has violated or failed to comply with any of the laws relating to the donation of state lands, the Attorney General shall file a complaint with the Commissioner of State Lands praying for the cancellation of the donation certificate.

(b)

The complaint shall set forth the reason for the cancellation of the certificate, and a copy of the complaint shall be served on the donee ten (10) days before the matter is heard by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(c)

The state and the donee may present affidavits as proof.

(d)

If the decision of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be adverse to the donee, the donee shall have the right to appeal to the Pulaski County Circuit Court from the decision.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 125, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 8728; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-310.

22-5-605. Suit involving state title — Cutting or removing timber pending final determination.

(a)

In all suits pending in any courts of this state where the state is a party of record claiming title to, or any interest in, any real estate, the title to which is in controversy in the suit, neither the party claiming adversely to the state in the suit nor any other person, firm, or corporation, whether a party to the record in the cause or not, shall, pending a final determination of the litigation, cut or remove from the lands any trees, logs, or timber thereon, except as provided in this section.

(b)

The court in which the cause of action is pending or the judge of the court in vacation may permit a party to the record in the cause, who is claiming in the cause of actions an interest adverse to the state in the lands and the trees, logs, or timber growing or being thereon, to cut or remove the trees, logs, or timber upon condition that the party shall file in the court, and in the cause, a petition praying such permission and containing a correct description of the particular lands on which the trees, logs, or timber desired to be cut or removed are situated, a correct estimate, by forty-acre tracts, of the trees, logs, or timber and the value of the trees, logs, or timber.

(c)

The petition shall be duly verified.

(d)

Upon reasonable notice to the adverse party, the petition, the allegations of which may be controverted, may be taken up by the court or judge in vacation and, if granted, shall be upon condition that the petitioners shall enter into a good and sufficient bond to the State of Arkansas. The bonds must be approved by the clerk of the court, in an amount not less than the reasonable cash market value of the trees or logs desired to be cut and removed, obligating the petitioner and his or her sureties to pay to the State of Arkansas all damages it may sustain by the granting of the petition, should it be finally determined in the cause that the state is the owner of the timber cut, of the logs cut and removed, or of any interest therein.

(e)

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation who has not complied with the provisions of this section to cut any growing timber situated on the lands referred to in the cause of action or to remove from the lands any logs or trees lying or being thereon.

(f)

If it is deemed necessary to protect against such trespass and hold intact the rights of the state, pending a final hearing and determination of the cause, the court or the judge in vacation may, at the instance of the state and without bond, grant an injunction or restraining order prohibiting trespass until the cause is finally determined.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 424, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6787, 6788; Pope's Dig., §§ 8724, 8725; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-313, 10-314.

22-5-606. Constitutional Officers Fund and State Central Services Fund.

All amounts recovered for the state shall be paid to the Treasurer of State to be credited to the Constitutional Officers Fund and State Central Services Fund for the support of the office of the Commissioner of State Lands, and each agent's per diem and expenses shall be paid from the fund.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 125, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-312n.

Subchapter 7

— Field Notes and Records

Cross References.

County surveyor to survey lands on application in accordance with entry, §14-15-706.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1854, p. 16, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1857, p. 67, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 12, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 111, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1933, No. 155, § 3: Mar. 25, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the United States District Land Office in Little Rock was discontinued on January 31, 1933, and all records pertaining to said office were transferred to the General Land Office in Washington, D.C., wherefore it is determined that great inconvenience does now attend the citizens of this state in obtaining information contained in said records, and for that reason an emergency is declared to exist. Therefore, for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it is imperative that this act become effective without delay and it shall upon its passage and approval become immediately effective.”

Acts 1939, No. 121, § 4: Feb. 22, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, great inconvenience now attends the citizens of this state in obtaining information contained in said records by reason of their not being in the custody and keeping of Commissioner of State Lands of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is found and is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall, upon its passage and approval, become immediately effective.”

Acts 2001, No. 1417, § 12: Apr. 9, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the fiscal year begins July 1, and it is efficient to establish the Division of Land Surveys within the Office of the Commissioner of State Lands on the same date as the fiscal year begins. If the division were transferred at a later date, the budget for the Arkansas Geological Commission and the Office of the Commissioner of State Lands would be confusing and irreparably harmed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

22-5-701. Field notes and other papers as public records — Right to inspect and copy.

(a)

The field notes, transcripts, documents, maps, plats, records, and other papers kept in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands are declared to be public records.

(b)

Under the authority and direction of the Director of the Bureau of Land Management, any deputy surveyor or other agent of the United States shall have free access to any such public records for the purpose of taking extracts therefrom or making copies thereof, without charge of any kind.

(c)

The Commissioner of State Lands and the clerks in his or her office shall be allowed to take extracts from or make copies of any of the public records in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(d)

All other persons may have the right to inspect the public records under the supervision of the Commissioner of State Lands or the clerks in his or her office.

(e)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall assign a space in his or her office for the reception and safekeeping of records and shall allow free access to the records by the authorities of the United States.

History.

Acts 1881, No. 12, §§ 2, 5, p. 18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4745, 4748; Acts 1933, No. 155, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 5447, 5824, 5827, 5833; Acts 1939, No. 121, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1202, 10-1205, 10-1207.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1881, No. 12, § 1, authorized the Commissioner of State Lands to take charge of the field notes, maps, records, and other papers pertaining to surveys of the public lands and land titles in Arkansas, which were formerly in the office of the Surveyor-General of the District of Arkansas.

Acts 1933, No. 155, § 1, as amended by Acts 1939, No. 121, § 1, provided that the Commissioner of State Lands take charge of all transcripts, documents, records, field notes, maps, plats, and other papers formerly kept in the United States District Land Office in Little Rock, Arkansas.

22-5-702. Copies, extracts, etc. — Recording — Admissibility as evidence.

(a)

All certified transcripts and copies of any of the public records in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands, properly certified by the Commissioner of State Lands, shall be entitled to be recorded in all deed records and shall be received in evidence in all courts of this state in the same manner and with like effect as the originals.

(b)

Any certified extract, entry of field notes, maps, records, or other papers, properly certified by the Commissioner of State Lands, shall be received in evidence in all courts of this state in the same manner as if the copy of the entire field notes, maps, records, or other papers had been produced.

History.

Acts 1881, No. 12, §§ 3, 4, p. 18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4746, 4747; Pope's Dig., §§ 5825, 5826; Acts 1939, No. 121, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1203, 10-1204, 10-1208.

22-5-703. Counties may obtain field notes — Appropriations.

(a)(1)

The county court of each county is authorized to ascertain at what price the field notes of survey of the lands in the county, together with township maps thereof, can be obtained. After the court shall have obtained a knowledge of the amount of expenses necessary to procure the field notes and township maps, it shall cause the price to be posted in an advertisement, at the courthouse door, requesting all the justices of the county to attend the next county court.

(2)

If a majority of the justices present shall vote in favor of paying the ascertained price, then the county court may proceed to procure the field notes and maps from the office of the Commissioner of State Lands. The field notes and maps so procured, certified by the Commissioner of State Lands, shall be lodged in the office of the clerk of the county court.

(b)

For putting this section into effect, each county is authorized to make the necessary appropriations out of any money in the county treasury not otherwise appropriated.

History.

Acts 1854, §§ 1, 4, p. 16; Acts 1857, § 1, p. 67; C. & M. Dig., § 4749; Pope's Dig., § 5828; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1209 — 10-1211.

22-5-704. Fees for copies.

(a)

The clerk of each county court shall issue, when called by any person, a copy of the field notes and maps of the county and is authorized to charge fifty cents (50¢) for each copy.

(b)

No copy shall contain more than three hundred twenty (320) acres without an additional charge of fifty percent (50%) on such enlargement on any one (1) copy, to be paid by the applicant.

(c)

The Commissioner of State Lands is directed to furnish free of charge to any county in this state which has lost its field notes of land surveys of the county by the burning of its courthouse copies of the field notes relating to the survey of lands in the county, at as early a time as may be, after the county judge of the county shall file with the Commissioner of State Lands an application for copies of the lost or destroyed field notes.

(d)

Each county surveyor shall have the liberty of copying any of the field notes and maps kept in the county courthouse for his or her own use, without charge of any kind.

(e)

It shall be the duty of the county clerk of each county to make a true report of all moneys collected by him or her for copies issued of the field notes and maps to the county court at settlement term in each year.

(f)

It shall be the duty of the court to charge the clerk thirty percent (30%) on all moneys collected by him or her pursuant to this section, and the court shall order the sheriff of the county to collect the percentage so charged and pay it over to the county treasurer, to be used as other county funds.

History.

Acts 1854, §§ 2, 3, p. 16; 1857, § 2, p. 67; 1893, No. 111, § 1, p. 196; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1905, 4750-4752, 6584; Pope's Dig., §§ 2422, 5829-5831, 8615; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1212 — 10-1215.

22-5-705. Applicability of Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act.

The office of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be subject to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1417, § 9.